Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-610
Precinct refunding bonds; terms; recitals; remedies.

The said funding bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall elect, shall mature not later than twenty years from their date, and may be payable at an earlier date if the county board so decides, shall bear interest which in rate and amount per annum shall not be greater than that of the bonds originally issued, payable annually or semiannually, shall bear coupons for the amount of the annual interest, shall contain a recital of the indebtedness for which they were issued, and shall have the same remedies for the enforcement as the original debt which they are intended to refund.

Laws 1901, c. 10, § 2, p. 61;

R.S.1913, § 433;

C.S.1922, § 350;

C.S.1929, § 11-609;

R.S.1943, § 10-610;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 12, p. 280.